Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2148
Utilities district; entry upon private property; when authorized.

Whenever it may be deemed necessary, the board of directors of the metropolitan utilities district or its employees shall have the authority, in the discharge of their duties, to enter upon any lands or premises for the examination or survey thereof, for the purpose of repairing any water or natural gas pipe, for the purpose of inspecting any water or natural gas service or the plumbing connected with any such service, for the purpose of removing or connecting any apparatus required in connection with such service and plumbing under the rules and regulations of the board, for the purpose of reading any meter or meters attached to the service, or for any other purpose whatsoever in connection with or relating to the water or natural gas service.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 10, p. 355;

R.S.1913, § 4252;

C.S.1922, § 3755;

C.S.1929, § 14-1011;

R.S.1943, § 14-1017;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1017;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 48.